en: edible coating originating from bovine collagen
hr: jestivi ovitak podrijetlom od goveđeg kolagena
it: rivestimento commestibile derivante dal collagene bovino

en: breadcrumbs, bread crumbs, breading
ar: بقسماط
be: Паніровачныя сухары
bg: Галета, панировка
ca: pa ratllat, farina de galeta
cs: strouhanka
da: rasp, panering, krydret panering
de: Paniermehl, Panur, Semmelbrösel
el: ψίχουλα ψωμιού
eo: raspaĵo
es: pan rallado, migas de pan, migaja de pan rallado, rebozador
eu: Ogi birrindu
fa: آرد سوخاری
fi: korppujauho, paneerausjauho, leivite, paneerausseos, maustepaneerausta
fr: Chapelure, panure, Chapelures
gl: Pan relado
he: פירורי לחם
hr: krušne mrvice
hu: zsemlemorzsa, kenyérmorzsa
id: Tepung roti
io: Raspo-pano
it: pangrattato, pane grattugiato, panatura
ja: パン粉
ko: 빵가루
lt: Malti džiūvėsiai
nb: strøkavring, griljermel
nl: paneermeel, Paneermelen
pl: bułka tarta, bułki tartej, panier
pt: pão ralado
ro: pesmet
ru: Панировочные сухари
sk: Strúhanka
sl: krušne drobtine
sv: panering, ströbröd, paneringsmjöl, brödsmulor, skorpmjöl, kryddpanering, skorpsmula
uk: Паніровка
vi: Vụn bánh mì
zh: 麵包屑

en: wheat breadcrumbs
it: pangrattato di grano
pl: bułka tarta pszenna, bułka tartka z pszenicy

en: wholemeal breadcrumbs
de: Vollkorn-Brotkrümel
es: pan rallado integral
hr: integralne prezle
it: pangrattato integrale
pt: pão ralado integral, pão integral ralado

en: rye bread breadcrumbs
da: rugbrødsrasp

fr: chapelure de blé
de: Weizenpaniermehl

en: panko
xx: panko
de: Panko
ru: панко

en: panada
xx: panada
de: Panade
fr: panade
mk: панада

en: tenkasu
xx: tenkasu
de: Tenkasu
ja: 天かす
th: เท็งกาซุ

en: Tenkasu with shrimp
it: tenkasu con gamberi
ja: えび入り天かす

en: cake, cakes
ar: كعك
az: Tort
be: пірожнае
bg: кекс
bn: পিষ্টক
bs: Torta
ca: Pastissos, pastís
ce: Мерза хьокхум
cs: buchta
cy: Teisen
da: kage
de: Kuchen, Torte
eo: kuko
es: Pasteles, pastel
et: Kook, koogid
eu: Gozopil
fa: کیک
fi: kakku
fr: gâteaux, Gâteau
ga: Císte
gl: Pastel
he: עוגה
hi: केक
hr: pita, kolač, kolača
ht: Gato
hu: Sütemények, sütemény
hy: տորթ
id: Bolu
io: Kuko
is: Kaka
it: torta
ja: ケーキ
jv: Bolu
kn: ಕೇಕ್
ko: 케이크
ku: Kulîçe
la: Scriblita
lt: Pyragas
lv: kūka
mk: колач
ml: കേക്ക്
mr: केक
ms: Kek
nb: kake
ne: केक
nl: taart, taarten, cake
nn: kake
oc: pastisson
pa: ਕੇਕ
pl: Ciasto, ciasta
pt: bolo, bolos
qu: Pastil
ro: Prăjitură
ru: пирожное
sh: Pita
si: කේක්
sr: торта
su: Bolu
sv: Tårta
sw: Keki
ta: அணிச்சல்
te: కేక్
th: เค้ก
tl: Kakanin
tr: Kek
uk: тістечко
ur: کیک
vi: bánh ngọt
wa: Wastea
yi: קוכן
zh: 蛋糕

en: flavored cake with cheese paste
hr: pasta okusa kolača sa sirom
it: torta aromatizzata con pasta di formaggio

en: sponge cake
de: Biskuitkuchen
es: bizcocho
hr: biskvit torta
it: pan di Spagna

en: Crêpe, Crêpes, crepe, crepes
ar: بان كيك
az: krep
be: Крэпы
bg: Палачинка, палачинки
br: Krampouezh
ca: crep
cs: crêpe
cv: Икерчĕ
cy: crêpe
da: pandekage
de: Crêpe, Crêpes
el: Κρέπα
eo: krespo
es: crepe
eu: Krepe
fa: پنکیک
fi: ohukainen
fr: crepe, crêpe, crêpes, crepes
gl: Crêpe
he: חביתית
hr: palačinka
hu: Palacsinta
hy: Ալաձիկ
id: Crêpe
io: krespo
is: Crêpe
it: Crepe, Crespella, Crêpes, Crêpe
ja: クレープ
ko: 크레프
la: Crispa
lb: Paangech
nb: crêpe
nl: crêpe, pannenkoek, pannekoeken
nn: pannekake
nv: Abeʼ neesmaasí
oc: Pescajon
pl: Naleśnik, naleśniki
pt: crepe, crepes
ro: Clătită
ru: Тонкие блинчики
sl: Palačinka
sq: Krepa
sr: палачинка
sv: Crêpes
th: เครป
tl: Crêpe
tr: Akıtma
tt: Коймак
uk: Креп
vi: Bánh kếp
wa: Vôte
zh: 可麗餅

en: wheat cakes
de: Weizenfladen
fr: galette de blé
hr: pšenične pogače
it: torte di grano

en: Petit-Beurre
de: Butterkekse, Butterkeks
el: πτι-μπερ
fr: petit beurre, Petits beurres
he: פתי בר
hr: petit-beurre
id: Petit-Beurre
lb: Petit-Beurre
nl: Petit Beurre
sr: Пти-бер
tr: Petibör
zh: 不的波

en: crouton, croutons
af: Crouton
be: грэнкі
bg: крутон, крутони
ca: crostó
cs: kruton
da: crouton, croutoner
de: Croûton, Croutons
el: κρουτόν
es: croûton
et: krutoonid
eu: ogi-txigorki
fi: krutonki, krutongit
fr: croûton, croûtons, croutons
he: קרוטונים
hr: kockica prepečenog kruha
it: crostini
ja: クルトン
kk: ерутон
kn: ಕ್ರೂಟಾನ್
ko: 크루통
nb: krutong, krutonger
nl: crouton, broodkorstjes, croutons
pl: kruton, grzanka, grzanki
pt: croûton
ro: crutoane
ru: гренки
sv: krutong, krutonger
tr: kruton
uk: грінки
zh: 麵包丁

en: müesli, Mueslis, Granola
af: Muesli
be: Мюслі
bg: Мюсли
ca: Musli
cs: müsli
da: Müsli
de: Müesli, Müslis
eo: Muslio
es: Muesli, Mueslis
et: Müsli
eu: Muesli
fi: Mysli
fr: muesli, müesli, Mueslis croustillants, Granolas
gl: Muesli
he: מוזלי
hi: safad musali
hr: muesli, zitnih pahuljica, Žitne pahuljice s voćem
hu: Müzli, Müzlik
it: Muesli
ja: ミューズリー
ko: 뮈슬리
lo: ມິວສະລີ
lt: Miuslis
ms: Muesli
nb: Müsli
nl: muesli, Mueslis
oc: Muesli
pl: Musli
pt: muesli
ro: Müsli
ru: Мюсли
sk: müsli
sr: Musli
sv: Müsli
th: มูสลี
tl: Müesli
tr: Müsli
uk: Мюслі
zh: 木斯里

en: tofu, Tofus, bean curds
an: Tofu
ar: توفو
az: Tofu
ba: Тофу
be: Тофу
bg: Тофу
bn: তফু
br: tofou
ca: tofu
cs: tofu
cv: Тофу
cy: toffw
da: tofu
de: Tofu, Bohnenquark, Bohnenkäse
el: Τόφου
eo: Tofuo
es: Tofu, Tofus
et: tofu
eu: Tofu
fa: توفو
fi: tofu
fr: tofu
ga: tófú
gl: Tofu
he: טופו
hi: टोफ़ू
hr: tofu
hu: Tofu
hy: Տոֆու
id: tahu
is: Tófú
it: Tofu
ja: 豆腐
jv: Tahu
ka: ტოფუ
kk: Тофу
km: តៅហ៊ូ
kn: ಟೋಫ಼ು
ko: 두부
lb: Tofu
lo: ເຕົາຮູ້
lt: Sojų varškė
lv: tofu, tofoe
mk: то́фу
ms: Tauhu
my: တိုဟူး
nb: tofu
ne: तोफु
nl: tofu, Tahoe
nn: tofu
or: ଟୋଫୁ
pa: ਟੋਫੂ
pl: tofu
pt: tofu
ro: tofu
ru: тофу
sh: Tofu
sk: tofu
sq: tofu
sr: Тофу
su: Tahu
sv: tofu
ta: டோஃபூ
th: เต้าหู้
tl: Tokwa
tr: tofu
uk: Тофу
vi: Đậu phụ
zh: 豆腐

en: tempeh
xx: tempeh
de: Tempeh